New Mexico, session 2026, SB242.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Three million dollars ($3,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the children, youth and families department for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 for the office of tribal affairs to contract for a field liaison to ensure compliance with the Indian Family Protection Act and the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund.